Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-204
Act; applicability.

Except as provided in section 86-124, the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act shall apply to all telecommunications companies providing basic local exchange service, intra-LATA interexchange service, inter-LATA interexchange service, and any other telecommunications service to subscribers in this state.

Laws 1999, LB 150, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1904;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 66.